bhojpuri.dix
    <pardef n="त/ू__pro_m_ea">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ोरोके</l>
          <r>ू<s n="pn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p2" /><s n="o" /><s n="ea" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ोरोसे</l>
          <r>ू<s n="pn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p2" /><s n="o" /><s n="ea" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ोरोमें</l>
          <r>ू<s n="pn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p2" /><s n="o" /><s n="ea" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ोरोप</l>
          <r>ू<s n="pn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p2" /><s n="o" /><s n="ea" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ोहनो</l>
          <r>ू<s n="pn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p2" /><s n="o" /><s n="ea" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ोहनोZथ्ण्झ्के</l>
          <r>ू<s n="pn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p2" /><s n="o" /><s n="ea" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ोहनोZथ्ण्झ्से</l>
          <r>ू<s n="pn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p2" /><s n="o" /><s n="ea" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ोहनोZथ्ण्झ्में</l>
          <r>ू<s n="pn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p2" /><s n="o" /><s n="ea" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ोहनोZथ्ण्झ्प</l>
          <r>ू<s n="pn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p2" /><s n="o" /><s n="ea" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="तू/__pro_d_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="d" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="d" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="तू/__pro_d_m_eo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हे</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="d" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हे</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="d" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="तू/__pro_d_m_ea">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हे</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="d" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हे</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="d" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ह/__hE">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इ</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p1" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>व</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p2" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p3" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इ</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p1" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उव</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p2" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>वन</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ह/__hE_eo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इयेह</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ह/__hE_ea">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इयोह</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ह/__hE_spl">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ोंइ</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="pl" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="रहल/__rahala">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ि</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="p1" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िन</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="p1" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="p2" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="p2" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="p3" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>न</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="p3" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ि</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="p1" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ु</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="p2" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ि</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="p3" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िं</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="p1" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ु</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="p2" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िं</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="p3" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="रहल/__rahala_eo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेह</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="रहल/__rahala_ea">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ोह</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="खा/__kara">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इके</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="कर/__kara">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इके</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ले/__kara">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इके</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="हो/__kara">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इके</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="त">
      <i>त</i>
      <par n="त/ू__pro_m_ea" />
    </e>
    <e lm="तू">
      <i>तू</i>
      <par n="तू/__pro_d_m_eo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="तू">
      <i>तू</i>
      <par n="तू/__pro_d_m_ea" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ह">
      <i>ह</i>
      <par n="ह/__hE" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ह">
      <i>ह</i>
      <par n="ह/__hE_eo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ह">
      <i>ह</i>
      <par n="ह/__hE_ea" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ह">
      <i>ह</i>
      <par n="ह/__hE_spl" />
    </e>
    <e lm="रहल">
      <i>रहल</i>
      <par n="रहल/__rahala" />
    </e>
    <e lm="रहल">
      <i>रहल</i>
      <par n="रहल/__rahala_eo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="रहल">
      <i>रहल</i>
      <par n="रहल/__rahala_ea" />
    </e>
    <e lm="खा">
      <i>खा</i>
      <par n="खा/__kara" />
    </e>
    <e lm="कर">
      <i>कर</i>
      <par n="कर/__kara" />
    </e>
    <e lm="हो">
      <i>हो</i>
      <par n="हो/__kara" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ले">
      <i>ले</i>
      <par n="ले/__kara" />
    </e>
